Hawaii, session 2026, SB641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 244D-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read as follows:
""Low alcohol by volume spirits beverage" means any
alcoholic beverage containing no more than five per cent alcohol
by volume. "Low alcohol by volume spirits beverage" includes
distilled spirits mixed with other ingredients, including both
nonalcohol and alcohol components."
SECTION 2. Section 244D-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Every person who sells or uses any liquor in the
State not taxable under this chapter, in respect of the
transaction by which the person or the person's vendor acquired
the liquor, shall pay a gallonage tax that is hereby imposed at
the following rates for the various liquor categories defined in
section 244D-1:
2025-0419 SB HMSO

Page 2
S.B. NO.(H
On [July 1,—1998, ] July 1, 2025, and thereafter, the tax
rate shall be:
(1) $5.98 per wine gallon on distilled spirits;
(2) $2.12 per wine gallon on sparkling wine;
(3) $1.38 per wine gallon on still wine;
(4) $0.85 per wine gallon on cooler beverages;
(5) $0.93 per wine gallon on beer other than draft beer;
[and]
(6) $0.54 per wine gallon on draft beer; and
(7) $0.85 per wine gallon on low alcohol by volume spirits
beverages;
and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity so sold or
used."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.

INTRODUCED BY
2025-0419 SB HMSO

S.B. NO.(o-H